Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 2. Attendance

§§ 1621,
1622.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1623.
Penalty for disobeying subpoena.

When a person upon whom a subpoena is legally served fails to appear according to such subpoena, without reasonable excuse, he or she shall forfeit to the party which issued the subpoena or on whose behalf it was issued a sum set by the court, but not exceeding $100.00 plus all costs of litigation incurred by that party as a result of the respondent’s noncompliance, including costs of issuing new subpoenas and incurring additional expenses for expert witnesses.
Such person shall also pay such party all just damages, to be recovered in an action of tort on this statute.

HISTORY:

Amended

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 1624.
Mittimus to compel attendance.

When it appears to a court that a subpoena has been legally served on a person, and that such person has not obeyed the subpoena, the court may issue a mittimus to compel his or her attendance.

HISTORY:

Amended

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.